Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 20. Vapor Product Safety

History.

2015 ch. 143, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-7-2001.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Child resistant packaging” means packaging that meets the standards set forth in 16 C.F.R. 1700.15(b), as amended as of July 1, 2015, when tested in accordance with the method described in 16 C.F.R. 1700.20, as amended as of July 1, 2015;

“Liquid nicotine container” means a bottle or other container of a liquid or other substance containing nicotine where the liquid or substance is sold, marketed or intended for use in a vapor product. A liquid nicotine container shall not include a liquid or other substance containing nicotine in a cartridge that is sold, marketed or intended for use in a vapor product provided that the cartridge is prefilled and sealed by the manufacturer and not intended to be opened by the consumer;

“Vapor product” means any noncombustible product containing nicotine that employs a heating element, power source, electronic circuit or other electronic, chemical or mechanical means, regardless of shape or size, that can be used to produce vapor from nicotine in a solution or other form. “Vapor product” includes any electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe or similar product or device, including any vapor cartridge or other container of nicotine in a solution or other form that is intended to be used with or in an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe or similar product or device. “Vapor product” does not include any product regulated as a drug or device by the United States food and drug administration under subchapter V of the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act.

History.

2015 ch. 143, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 143, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2015.

§ 35-7-2002.
Child resistant packaging required.

Any liquid nicotine container sold to consumers in this state shall be sold in child resistant packaging.

Any person who sells a liquid nicotine container in violation of subsection (a) of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00) for the first violation and by a fine of not more than one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500.00) for each subsequent violation.

This article shall be enforced by the consumer health services division of the department of agriculture. The division’s inspection or enforcement duties under this subsection may be performed by a county or local department of health with which the division has a memorandum of understanding for inspections.

History.

2015 ch. 143, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective date. —

Laws 2015, ch. 143, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2015.